Massachusetts, session 194th, H2660.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 Section 184A(a) is hereby amended by striking the following words: “and 13
members who shall be appointed by the governor” and replaced with the following: “and 15
members who shall be appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall be nominated by the
president of the Massachusetts Organization of State Engineers and Scientists, 1 of whom shall
be nominated by the union representing the Boston Police Crime Laboratory Unit.
of 1